District of Columbia statutes.
39-309

Retention of Council’s authority.

The Council of the District of Columbia retains the full right to repeal or amend this chapter at any time.

July 26, 1980, D.C. Law 3-79, § 10, 27 DCR 2546
1981 Ed., § 31-2109.